apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="ř/íkat__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>íkati</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkat</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkejme</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkej</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkejte</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkán</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkáni</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkánu</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkány</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkána</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkáno</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkánas</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkános</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikal</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkal</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkalť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikali</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkali</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkaliť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikaly</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkaly</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkalyť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikala</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkala</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkalať</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikalo</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkalo</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkaloť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikals</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkals</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikalas</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkalas</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ikalos</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkalos</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkam</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkám</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkámť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkáme</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkámeť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkáš</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkášť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkáte</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkáteť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íká</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkáť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkají</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkajíť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkaj</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkajť</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkaje</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkajíc</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íkajíce</l><r>íkat<s n="vblex"/><s n="trans"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="š__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>el</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>elť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>li</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>liť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ly</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lyť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>la</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lať</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>lo</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>loť</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>els</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>las</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>los</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="přiš"><i>přiš</i><par n="š__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="říkat"><i>ř</i><par n="ř/íkat__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="š"><i>š</i><par n="š__vblex"/></e>
